Oklahoma, session 2026, SB709.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 13A-105, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 13A-105. Candidates for member of the board of


education of every school district or technology center school


district shall file declarations of candidacy in the same place and


with the same officials as candidates for county office. The


declaration of candidacy to be signed by the candidate shall have an


attachment to be signed by the candidate listing the requirements of

Req. No. 1382 Page 1


a candidate for election or reelection to a school board as set


forth in Sections 13A-106 and 5-105a of this title and Sections 5-


110, 5-110.1, and 5-113 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


the candidate shall swear or affirm that he or she is eligible to


run for the office or serve in the office if elected. Candidates


for a school board office to be filled in the regular election as


provided in subsection A of Section 13A-103 of this title shall file


on the first Monday in December through the following Wednesday.


Candidates for a school board office to be filled in a special


election shall file on a Monday through the following Wednesday that


is at least ten (10) days after the seat has been declared vacant.


For school districts and technology center school districts located


in more than one county, filing may be either in the county wherein


supervision of the district is located or in the county where the


candidate resides.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 13A-110, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 13A-110. A. Except as provided for in subsection F of


this section, vacancies Vacancies for members of the board of


education of every school district or technology center school


district shall be filled by appointment by the board election for


the balance of the unexpired term.


B. Except as provided for in subsection D of this section,


persons appointed to fill such vacancies in the first half of the

Req. No. 1382 Page 2


term of office for the board position shall serve only until the


next succeeding election, at which time the office which they hold


shall be placed on the ballot for the balance of the unexpired term.


Vacancies filled by appointment following the delivery of the


resolution calling for regular elections to the secretary of the


county election board shall be filled until the regular elections


the following year. upon notification of a vacancy, the board of


education shall make a vacancy declaration at its next regularly


scheduled meeting, set the filing dates for declarations of


candidacy, and adopt the resolution calling for a special election


as provided for in Section 13A-109 of this title. If the vacancy is


declared within the first fourteen (14) days of November, the board


of education shall use the regular election process provided for in


subsection A of Section 13A-103 of this title to fill the office.


If the vacancy is declared at any other time of the year, the board


of education shall call for a special election as provided for in


subsection C of Section 13A-103 of this title and Section 13A-109 of


this title. The special election shall be called on a date


established by subsection B of Section 3-101 of this title, and the


special filing period shall be scheduled as required in subsection D


of Section 13A-109 of this title. Persons elected to fill unexpired


terms shall begin those terms at the next regular meeting of the


board of education following the election. Persons appointed to


fill such vacancies after the first half of the term of office for

Req. No. 1382 Page 3


the board position shall serve for the balance of the unexpired


term.


C. Except as provided for in subsection D of this section, no


person shall be appointed elected to a board of education who does


not meet the eligibility qualifications needed to be a candidate for


such position as provided for in Section 13A-106 of this title and


Sections 5-110, 5-110.1, and 5-113 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


D. If after the filing period is closed no candidate for an


open position on a board of education of a school district has filed


and therefore a vacancy is created, the vacancy shall be filled by


appointment by the board. Persons appointed to fill such vacancies


shall not be required to reside in the board or election district


but shall be required to reside in the school district and to meet


the other eligibility qualifications needed to be a candidate for


the position as provided for in Section 13A-106 of this title and


Sections 5-110, 5-110.1, and 5-113 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. Persons appointed to fill vacancies as provided for in


this subsection shall be eligible to serve only for the balance of


the term.


E. If the board of education does not fill the vacancy by


appointment within sixty (60) days of the date the board declared


the seat vacant, the board of education shall call a special


election to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term. The special

Req. No. 1382 Page 4


election shall be called on a date established by subsection B of


Section 3-101 of this title, and the special filing period shall be


scheduled as required in subsection D of Section 13A-109 of this


title.


F. If vacancies occur which result in a loss of a majority of


members of the board of education of a school district or technology


center school district, the Governor shall appoint a member or


members necessary to constitute a quorum to the board of education


pursuant to the authority granted by Section 13 of Article VI of the


Oklahoma Constitution. Such appointment shall be consistent with


the requirements of this section and shall only be for the remainder


of the term of office.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1382 EB 1/19/2025 5:41:47 AM











Req. No. 1382 Page 5